Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0032.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2434. (1) The commissioner, director, after consultation with associations representative of physician interests and with authorized insurers writing malpractice insurance for physicians in this state shall prescribe the rating classifications for use by insurers in writing malpractice insurance for physicians. (2) Before 1 year after the effective date of chapter 49 and before implementing the rating classifications prescribed pursuant to subsection (1), the commissioner shall furnish to the legislature and the governor the rating classifications which he or she intends to prescribe pursuant to this section.By an annual date as determined by the director, an insurer that offers a policy of medical malpractice insurance shall provide the department with information about the insurer's policies related to perinatal care services in a manner determined by the department. Not later than 60 days after the department receives the information under this subsection, the department shall submit the information received from insurers to the department of health and human services for the purpose of the study required under section 2617b(2) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368. MCL 333.2617b. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 29.